Tennessee, session 114, HB2396.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-221-711, is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) The adding of fluoride to a public water system by the supplier of water who
owns, operates, or controls the public water system.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2396
000977
- 1 -